Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.910

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 240.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1971.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 240 s 24.]